Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1329
Receptacle, other term, defined.

As used in sections 28-1329 to 28-1334, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Receptacle shall mean not only bottles, siphons, tins, kegs, one-eighth barrels, quarter barrels, half barrels, barrels, boxes, ice cream cabinets, cans and tubs, but all other receptacles used for holding any of the commodities in the sections mentioned; and

(2) Requirement for a written transfer, bill of sale, authority, or consent shall mean that it shall be signed by the person named in the certificate issued by the Secretary of State as provided in such sections, or by a transferee claiming under a written transfer signed by such person, or by an agent whose authority is in writing signed by such person or such transferee.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 313.